Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.863

Faculty tenure—Review prior to dismissal—Scope—Recommendations of review committee.

Prior to the dismissal of a tenured faculty member, or a faculty member holding an unexpired probationary faculty appointment, the case shall first be reviewed by a review committee. The review shall include testimony from all interested parties including, but not limited to, other faculty members and students. The faculty member whose case is being reviewed shall be afforded the right of cross-examination and the opportunity to defend himself or herself. The review committee shall prepare recommendations on the action they propose be taken and submit such recommendations to the appointing authority prior to their final action.

[ 2011 c 336 s 743; 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 41. Formerly RCW 28.85.863.]

NOTES:

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.150.050.